Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.410

Manifest of cargo—Bill of lading.

(1) A copy of a manifest of cargo, on a form prescribed by the director, shall be carried on any vehicle transporting agricultural products purchased by a dealer or cash buyer, or consigned to a commission merchant from the consignor thereof when prescribed by the director. A bill of lading may be carried in lieu of a manifest of cargo for an agricultural product other than hay or straw.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the commission merchant, dealer, or cash buyer of agricultural products shall issue a copy of the manifest or bill of lading to the consignor of the agricultural products and the original shall be retained by the licensee for a period of three years during which time it shall be surrendered upon request to the director. The manifest of cargo is valid only when signed by the licensee or his or her agent and the consignor or his or her authorized representative of the agricultural products.

(3) The commission merchant or dealer of hay or straw shall issue a copy of a manifest to the consignor. The original copy shall be retained by the commission merchant or dealer for a period of three years during which time it shall be surrendered upon request to the director. The manifest of cargo is valid only when signed by the licensee or his or her agent and the consignor or his or her authorized representative of hay or straw.

(4) Manifest forms will be provided to licensees at the actual cost for the manifests plus necessary handling costs incurred by the department.

[ 2003 c 395 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 12; 1959 c 139 s 41.]